Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-170
Board; business; how transacted.

The department shall, as far as practicable, provide for the conducting of the business of the boards by mail and may hold meetings by virtual conferencing subject to the Open Meetings Act. Any official action or vote of the members of a board taken by mail shall be preserved in the records of the department and shall be recorded in the board's minutes by the department.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 21, p. 459;

C.S.1929, § 71-311;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 9, p. 541;

R.S.1943, § 71-121;

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 8;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 11;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 8;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 114;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 25;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 16;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-121;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 70;

Laws 2021, LB83, § 4.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.